Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1911
Violations; penalty.

Except as provided in section 60-1908, any person violating the provisions of sections 60-1901 to 60-1911 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 11;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 101;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 12;

Laws 2018, LB275, § 6.